Tennessee, session 114, HB0468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-103(b)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) Reckless endangerment by discharging a firearm or antique firearm into a
habitation, as defined by § 39-14-401, or motor vehicle, as defined by § 55-1-103, is a
Class C felony, unless the habitation or motor vehicle was unoccupied at the time of the
offense, in which event the offense is a Class D felony.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0468
000981
- 1 -